Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.040

Park and recreation board—Terms of members.

For the appointive positions on the county park and recreation board the initial terms shall be two years for two positions, four years for two positions, and six years for the remaining positions plus the period in each instance to the next following June 30th; thereafter the term for each appointive position shall be six years and shall end on June 30th.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 94; 1963 c 4 s 36.68.040. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-17.]